src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Avoir
+V+Inf:aveir # ;
+V:ai PresPart ;
+V+Part+Past+Gram/Early:eüt # ;
+V+Part+Past+Gram/Early:oüt # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:ai # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:as # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:a%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:avons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:avez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:ont # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:unt # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind+Gram/Early:eüi # ;
+V+1s+SPast+Ind:oi # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind+Gram/Early:eüs # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind+Gram/Late:oüs # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind+Gram/Early:eü # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:ot # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind+Gram/Late:out # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind+Gram/Early:eümes # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind+Gram/Late:oümes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind+Gram/Early:eütes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind+Gram/Late:oütes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind+Gram/Early:eürent # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:orent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:aveie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:aveis # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:aveit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:aviiens # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:aviions # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram:aviiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:aveient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:avrai # ;
+V+1s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:arai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:avras # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:aras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:avra%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:ara%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:avrons # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:arons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:avreiz # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:avrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:areiz # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:arez # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:avront # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:aront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:aie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:aies # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:aiet # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:ait # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:aiiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:aions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:aiiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:aient # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Early:eüsse # ;
+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Late:oüsse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Early:eüsses # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Late:oüsses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Early:eüst # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Late:oüst # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Early:eüssons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Early:eüssiens # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Late:oüssons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Late:oüssiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Early:eüsseiz # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Early:eüssez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Early:eüssiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Late:oüsseiz # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Late:oüssez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Late:oüssiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Early:eüssent # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Early:oüssent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:avreie # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:areie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:avreies # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:areies # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:avreit # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:areit # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:areit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:avriiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:avrions # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:ariiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:arions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:avriiez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:ariiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:avreient # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:areient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:aies # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:aiiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:aiions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:aiiez # ;

LEXICON Estre
+V+Inf:estre # ;
+V:est PresPart ;
+V:est PastPart ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:sui # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:es # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:ies # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:est # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:somes # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:esmes # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:estes # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:sont # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:sunt # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:fui # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:fus # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:fu%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:fud # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:fumes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:fustes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:furent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:ere # ;
+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:iere # ;
+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Late:esteie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:eres # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:ieres # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Late:esteies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:eret # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:ieret # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:ert # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:iert # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Late:esteit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:eriiens # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:erions # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Late:estiiens # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Late:estions # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:eriiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Late:estiiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:erent # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:ierent # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Late:esteient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:er # ;
+V+1s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:ier # ;
+V+1s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:serai # ;
+V+1s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:estrai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:ers # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:iers # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:seras # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:estras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:ert # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:iert # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:sera%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:estra%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:ermes # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:iermes # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:serons # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:estrons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:serez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:sereiz # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:estreiz # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:estrez # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:erent # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Early:ierent # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:seront # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:estront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:seie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:seies # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:sei%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:seiiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:seions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:seiiez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:soiiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:seient # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:fusse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:fusses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:fust # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:feust # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:fussons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:fussiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:fusseiz # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:fussez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:fussiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:fussent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:sereie # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:estreie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:sereies # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:estreies # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:sereit # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:estreit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:seriiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:serions # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:estriiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:estrions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:seriiez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:estriiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:sereient # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:estreient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:seies # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:seiiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:seions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:seiiez # ;
